Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.121, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 37. new text end new text begin High frequency service. new text end new text begin "High frequency service" means regular route transit in which transit vehicle departures and subsequent vehicle arrivals at a transit stop or station for each route are scheduled to meet: new text end new text begin (1) on weekdays, service intervals of ten minutes or less over a period of at least 12 hours; new text end new text begin (2) on weekends, service intervals of 15 minutes or less over a period of at least 12 hours; and new text end new text begin (3) daily between 9:00 p.m. and midnight, service intervals of 15 minutes or less. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.146, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Development guide;deleted text end Transportationnew text begin policy plannew text end . new text begin (a) new text end The transportation deleted text begin chapterdeleted text end new text begin policy plannew text end must include policies relating to all transportation forms and be designed to promote the legislative determinations, policies, deleted text begin anddeleted text end goalsnew text begin , and performance measuresnew text end set forth in section 473.371. new text begin In developing the transportation policy plan, the council must establish a process to solicit, collect, and evaluate public input throughout the metropolitan area.new text end new text begin (b) new text end In addition to the requirements of subdivision 1 regarding the contents of the policy plan, the nontransit element of the transportation deleted text begin chapterdeleted text end new text begin policy plannew text end must include the following: (1) a statement of the needs and problems of the metropolitan area with respect to the functions covered, including the present and prospective demand for and constraints on access to regional business concentrations and other major activity centers and the constraints on and acceptable levels of development and vehicular trip generation at such centers; (2) the objectives of and the policies to be forwarded by the policy plan; (3) a general description of the physical facilities and services to be developed; (4) a statement as to the general location of physical facilities and service areas; (5) a general statement of timing and priorities in the development of those physical facilities and service areas; (6) a detailed statement, updated every two years, of timing and priorities for improvements and expenditures needed on the metropolitan highway system; (7) a general statement on the level of public expenditure appropriate to the facilities; and (8) a long-range assessment of air transportation trends and factors that may affect airport development in the metropolitan area and policies and strategies that will ensure a comprehensive, coordinated, and timely investigation and evaluation of alternatives for airport development. new text begin (c) new text end The council deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end develop the nontransit element in consultation with the transportation advisory board and the Metropolitan Airports Commission and cities having an airport located within or adjacent to its corporate boundaries. The council deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end also take into consideration the airport development and operations plans and activities of the commission. The council deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end transmit the results to the state Department of Transportation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.1466, is amended to read: 473.1466 TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM PERFORMANCE EVALUATION. (a) Prior to each major revision of the transportation policy plan, the council must carry out a performance evaluation of the metropolitan area's transportation system as a whole. The performance evaluation must: (1) evaluate the area's ability to meet the need for effective and efficient transportation of goods and people; (2) evaluate trends and their impacts on the area's transportation system; (3) assess the region's success in meeting the currently adopted regional transportation benchmarksnew text begin and the performance measures under section 473.371, subdivision 3new text end ; and (4) include an evaluation of the regional transit system, including a comparison with peer metropolitan regions with regard to key operating and investment measurements. (b) The council must update the evaluation of the regional transit system every two years. (c) The council deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end use the results of the performance evaluation to make recommendations for improving the system in each revision of the transportation policy plan. (d) The council must conduct a peer review of the performance evaluation using at least two nationally recognized transportation and transit consultants. (e) The council must submit the performance evaluation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees and divisions with jurisdiction over transportation finance and policy. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.371, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Transit performance measures. new text end new text begin (a) The council must incorporate performance measures as specified under this subdivision in its transit system planning, analysis, and evaluation. new text end new text begin (b) A service density performance measure is the number of residents located within one-half mile of a regular route transit stop or station for high frequency service, as follows: new text end new text begin (1) 250,000 beginning in 2030; new text end new text begin (2) 500,000 beginning in 2035; and new text end new text begin (3) 1,000,000 beginning in 2040. new text end new text begin (c) An efficiency performance measure is a decrease in average transit operating costs by at least the following, compared with the average operating costs over calendar years 2023 to 2025: new text end new text begin (1) .... percent by 2030; new text end new text begin (2) .... percent by 2035; and new text end new text begin (3) .... percent by 2040. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this subdivision prevents the council from establishing additional performance measures. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [473.378] TRANSIT SYSTEM INVESTMENT FRAMEWORK. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Busway" has the meaning given in section 473.4485, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Framework" means the transit system investment framework under this section. new text end new text begin (d) "Guideway" has the meaning given in section 473.4485, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Framework establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The council must adopt a transit system investment framework that identifies expanded transit coverage and system improvements sufficient to meet the adopted regional transit benchmarks, including federal performance measures, and all performance measures under section 473.371, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) The council must develop the initial framework by February 1, 2027, and must update the framework in conjunction with each major revision of the transportation policy plan or following a significant change in transit finance for the metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (c) The council must submit the framework to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Framework requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The framework must use the planning period of the transportation policy plan. The framework is not fiscally constrained by expected available funds over the planning period. new text end new text begin (b) The framework must: new text end new text begin (1) establish a methodology and criteria to identify, evaluate, and prioritize transit routes under the framework; new text end new text begin (2) identify busway and guideway routes and specify geographic information on each route; new text end new text begin (3) estimate schedules for project development and construction of the identified routes under clause (2); new text end new text begin (4) address service and facility improvements; and new text end new text begin (5) develop preliminary fiscal estimates that include costs for capital, operations, and maintenance and a comparison to expected available funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Framework consistency; limitations. new text end new text begin (a) On or after March 1, 2027, the commissioner of transportation and a political subdivision must not commence roadway work for a highway project in a manner that is inconsistent with the transit system investment framework. new text end new text begin (b) The prohibition under this subdivision includes but is not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning, resurfacing, and rehabilitation. The prohibition under this subdivision does not apply to planning, project development, environmental analysis, land acquisition, and routine preventive maintenance. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Framework consistency; inconsistent projects; funds reallocation. new text end new text begin (a) Following an inconsistency under subdivision 4, funds must be reallocated as follows: new text end new text begin (1) for a Department of Transportation project, .... percent of motor vehicle lease sales tax revenue under section 297A.815, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clause (4), otherwise distributed to the trunk highway fund must be reallocated to the transportation impact assessment and mitigation account under section 161.178, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (2) for a council project, .... percent of regional transportation sales tax revenue under section 297A.9915, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (1), otherwise distributed to the council must be reallocated in equal amounts to metropolitan counties for the purposes specified under section 473.4465, subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (3) for a county project, .... percent of regional transportation sales tax revenue under section 297A.9915, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (2), otherwise distributed to that county must be reallocated to the council for the purposes specified under section 473.4465, subdivision 2, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (4) for a city project, either of the following sources, as applicable, otherwise distributed to that city must be reallocated to the transportation impact assessment and mitigation account under section 161.178, subdivision 8: new text end new text begin (i) .... percent of small cities assistance under section 162.145; or new text end new text begin (ii) .... percent of larger cities assistance under section 162.146. new text end new text begin (b) For each determination of inconsistency, the appropriate commissioner of transportation or revenue must reallocate or transfer the relevant funds as provided under paragraph (a) on a onetime basis in the following fiscal year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. Subdivisions 4 and 5 do not apply to a highway project that was either included in a transportation improvement program or has been submitted for approval of the geometric layout before March 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.405, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Condemnation. new text begin (a) new text end The council may for transit purposes acquire property, franchises, easements, or property rights or interests of any kind by condemnation proceedings pursuant to chapter 117. Except as provided in subdivision 9, the council may take possession of any property for which condemnation proceedings have been commenced at any time after the filing of the petition describing the property in the proceedings. The council may contract with an operator or other persons for the use by the operator or person of any property under the council's control. new text begin (b) "Transit purposes" under this subdivision includes but is not limited to advancing transit-oriented development, as defined in section 473.852, subdivision 12: new text end new text begin (1) in existing transit corridors; new text end new text begin (2) in transit corridors identified in the transportation policy plan or transit system investment framework under section 473.378; and new text end new text begin (3) within one-half mile of transit corridors under clause (1) or (2). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.852, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Transit-oriented development. new text end new text begin "Transit-oriented development" means a set of planning practices, standards, and zoning for a geographic area to enable development that: new text end new text begin (1) allows mixed uses in close proximity to one another, which may include higher-density residential, mixed types of residential dwellings, commercial, institutional, and open spaces; and new text end new text begin (2) supports pedestrian, nonmotorized, and transit forms of travel. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [473.8705] DEVELOPMENT FOR TRANSIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Transit capital project expenditures. new text end new text begin (a) On or after March 1, 2027, a local governmental unit must not expend funds for construction of a transit capital project located outside transit market areas I or II, as specified in the transportation policy plan under section 473.146, subdivision 3, unless the official controls of that local governmental unit for the area within .... mile of each station or stop under the project are in conformance with transit-oriented development. new text end new text begin (b) The prohibition under this subdivision does not apply to planning, project development, environmental analysis, land acquisition, and routine preventive maintenance. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acquisition of property for transit-oriented development. new text end new text begin The council, a local governmental unit, or a housing and redevelopment authority may acquire property within .... miles of a transit corridor for transit-oriented development. The council, a local governmental unit, or a housing and redevelopment authority may retain ownership of the development or may enter into a lease-management agreement with a nonprofit organization for the operation of the development. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin TRANSPORTATION POLICY PLAN AMENDMENT.new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the Metropolitan Council must adopt an amendment to the transportation policy plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.146, that incorporates the performance measures specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.371, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end